Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.170.075

Findings—Intent.

(1) The legislature finds that the provision of drug and alcohol counseling and related prevention and intervention services in schools will enhance the classroom environment for students and teachers, and better enable students to realize their academic and personal potentials.

(2) The legislature finds that it is essential that resources be made available to school districts to provide early drug and alcohol prevention and intervention services to students and their families; to assist in referrals to treatment providers; and to strengthen the transition back to school for students who have had problems of drug and alcohol abuse.

(3) Substance abuse awareness programs funded under this chapter do not fall within the definition of basic education for purposes of Article IX of the state Constitution and the state's funding duty thereunder.

(4) The legislature intends to provide grants for drug and alcohol abuse prevention and intervention in schools, targeted to those schools with the highest concentrations of students at risk.

[ 1995 c 335 s 204; 1990 c 33 s 156; 1989 c 271 s 310. Formerly RCW 28A.120.080.]

NOTES:

Part headings, table of contents not law—1995 c 335: See note following RCW 28A.150.360.

Severability—1989 c 271: See note following RCW 9.94A.510.